Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Definitions

177.010.
Definitions for KRS 177.010 to 177.890.

As used in KRS

177.010

to

177.890

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means Department of Highways of the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Construct” includes reconstruct and improve;

“Roads” includes rural roads; highways; bridges and bridge approaches; city streets, viaducts, and bridges;

“Rural and secondary roads” includes:

A county road as defined in KRS 178.010(1)(b);

A publicly-owned road other than a state or federal highway, that is outside a city, town, or urban area having a population of twenty-five hundred (2,500) or more;

A road that is classified as part of the rural secondary road system by the Department of Highways;

“Public grade crossing” means the at-grade intersection of a railroad track or tracks and a road or highway that has been dedicated to public use and incorporated into either the state primary road system or the highway or road system of a county or municipality;

“Cabinet” means the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet; and

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet.

History.

4356t-17-2e: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 23, § 1; 1992, ch. 229, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 238, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 64, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.